ro-RO: Funcția lămpii remorcii: Lumină de frână/stop; Lumină de gabarit; Combinație poziție/stop/semnalizare; Lumină interior/marfă; Lumină pentru plăcuța de înmatriculare; Reflector; Lumină de marșarier; Lumină de marcare laterală; Lumină de poziție spate; A treia lumină de frână; Semnalizator; Altele
ja: トレーラーライト機能: ブレーキ / ストップランプ; クリアランスランプ; テール / ストップ / ウィンカー兼用; インテリア / カーゴランプ; ナンバープレートランプ; リフレクター; バックランプ; サイドマーカーランプ; テールランプ; サードブレーキランプ; ウィンカー; その他
pt-BR: Luz de reboque função: Luz de freio; Luz de folga; Combinação de lanterna/freio/seta; Luz interna/de carga; Luz da placa de licença; Refletor; Luz de ré; Luz de marcação lateral; Lanterna traseira; Terceira luz de freio; Luz de seta; Outro
el: Λειτουργία φωτός τρέιλερ: Φως φρένων/στοπ; Φως όγκου; Συνδυασμός φωτός πορείας/φρένων/φλας; Φως εσωτερικού χώρου/χώρου φόρτωσης; Φως πινακίδας; Ανακλαστήρας; Φως όπισθεν; Φως πλευρικής σήμανσης; Φως πορείας; Τρίτο φως φρένων; Φλας; Άλλο
de: Funktion der Anhängerbeleuchtung: Bremslicht/Stopplicht; Umrissleuchte; Kombiniertes Rück-/Brems-/Blinklicht; Innen-/Laderaumbeleuchtung; Kennzeichenbeleuchtung; Reflektor; Rückfahrlicht; Seitenmarkierungsleuchte; Rücklicht; Drittes Bremslicht; Blinker; Sonstige
fi: Perävaunun valotoiminnot: Jarruvalo; Äärivalo; Taka-/jarru-/suuntavaloyhdistelmä; Sisä-/tavaratilan valo; Rekisterikilven valo; Heijastin; Peruutusvalo; Sivuhuomiovalo; Takavalo; Kolmas jarruvalo; Suuntavilkku; Muu
tr: Römork lambası fonksiyonu: Fren/stop lambası; Gabarit lambası; Kombinasyon arka/fren/sinyal; İç/kargo lambası; Plaka lambası; Reflektör; Geri vites lambası; Yan işaret lambası; Arka lamba; Üçüncü fren lambası; Sinyal lambası; Diğer
cs: Funkce světel přívěsu: Brzdové světlo; Obrysové světlo; Kombinované zadní / brzdové / směrové světlo; Vnitřní osvětlení / osvětlení nákladového prostoru; Osvětlení registrační značky; Odrazka; Couvací světlo; Boční obrysové světlo; Zadní světlo; Třetí brzdové světlo; Směrové světlo; Jiné
zh-TW: 拖車燈功能: 煞車燈/停止燈; 間隙燈; 尾燈/停止燈/方向燈組合; 車內/貨廂燈; 車牌燈; 反光鏡; 倒車燈; 側邊標誌燈; 尾燈; 第三煞車燈; 方向燈; 其他
pt-PT: Função da luz do reboque: Luz de travagem; Luz delimitadora; Combinação de farolim traseiro/travagem/mudança de direção; Luz interior/de carga; Luz da matrícula; Refletor; Luz de marcha-atrás; Luz de presença lateral; Farolim traseiro; Terceira luz de travagem; Sinal de mudança de direção; Outro
ru: Функция фонаря прицепа: Стоп-сигнал; Габаритный фонарь; Комбинированный (задний/стоп/поворот); Освещение салона/грузового отсека; Фонарь освещения номерного знака; Светоотражатель; Фонарь заднего хода; Боковой габаритный фонарь; Задний фонарь; Третий стоп-сигнал; Указатель поворота; Другое
hu: Utánfutó világítás Functions: Féklámpa; Méretjelző lámpa; Kombinált hátsó/fék/irányjelző; Belső/raktér világítás; Rendszámtábla-világítás; Fényvisszaverő; Tolatólámpa; Oldalsó helyzetjelző lámpa; Hátsó lámpa; Harmadik féklámpa; Irányjelző; Egyéb
en: Trailer light function: Brake/stop light; Clearance light; Combination tail/stop/turn; Interior/cargo light; License plate light; Reflector; Reverse light; Side marker light; Tail light; Third brake light; Turn signal; Other
lt-LT: Priekabos žibintų Functions: Stabdžių / „Stop“ žibintas; Gabaritinis žibintas; Kombinuotas (gabaritinis / stabdžių / posūkio); Vidaus / krovinių skyriaus apšvietimas; Valstybinio numerio ženklo apšvietimas; Atšvaitas; Atbulinės eigos žibintas; Šoninis gabaritinis žibintas; Galinis žibintas; Trečiasis stabdžių žibintas; Posūkio žibintas; Kita
bg-BG: Функция на светлините на ремаркето: Спирачна светлина/стоп; Габаритна светлина; Комбиниран габарит/стоп/мигач; Вътрешно/товарно осветление; Светлина за регистрационна табела; Светлоотразител; Светлина за заден ход; Страничен габарит; Задна светлина; Трети стоп; Мигач; Друго
pl: Funkcja oświetlenia przyczepy: Światło hamowania (stop); Światło obrysowe; Zespolone światło tylne / hamowania / kierunkowskaz; Światło wewnętrzne / przestrzeni ładunkowej; Oświetlenie tablicy rejestracyjnej; Odblask; Światło cofania; Boczne światło pozycyjne; Światło tylne; Trzecie światło hamowania; Kierunkowskaz; Inne
es: Funciones de las luces del remolque: Luz de freno/parada; Luz de gálibo; Luz combinada trasera/de freno/direccional; Luz interior/de carga; Luz de matrícula; Reflector; Luz de reversa; Luz de posición lateral; Luz trasera; Tercera luz de freno; Luz direccional; Otra
th: ฟังก์ชันของไฟท้ายรถพ่วง: ไฟเบรก/ไฟหยุด; ไฟกะระยะ; ไฟท้าย/เบรก/เลี้ยวแบบรวม; ไฟห้องโดยสาร/สัมภาระ; ไฟส่องป้ายทะเบียน; ตัวสะท้อนแสง; ไฟถอยหลัง; ไฟกะระยะด้านข้าง; ไฟท้าย; ไฟเบรกดวงที่สาม; ไฟเลี้ยว; อื่นๆ
ko: 트레일러 라이트 기능: 브레이크/정지등; 차폭등; 조합 테일/정지/회전; 실내/화물등; 번호판등; 반사경; 후진등; 측면 표시등; 테일등; 보조 브레이크등; 방향 지시등; 기타
nl: Trailerlicht functie: Rem-/stoplicht; Markeringslicht; Combinatie achter-/stop-/knipperlicht; Interieur-/laadruimteverlichting; Kentekenplaatverlichting; Reflector; Achteruitrijlicht; Zijmarkeringslicht; Achterlicht; Derde remlicht; Knipperlicht; Overig
sl-SI: Funkcija luči priklopnika: Zavorna luč; Gabaritna luč; Kombinirana zadnja/zavorna/smerna luč; Notranja luč/luč tovornega prostora; Luč registrske tablice; Odsevnik; Luč za vzvratno vožnjo; Stranska gabaritna luč; Zadnja luč; Tretja zavorna luč; Smernik; Drugo
sv: Släpvagnsbelysning – funktion: Broms-/stoppljus; Positionsljus; Kombinerat bak-/broms-/blinkersljus; Interiör-/lastbelysning; Skyltbelysning; Reflex; Backljus; Sidomarkeringsljus; Bakljus; Tredje bromsljus; Blinkers; Övrigt
nb: Tilhengerlys-funksjon: Bremse-/stopplys; Markeringslys; Kombinasjon bak-/stopp-/blinklys; Interiør-/lasteromslys; Nummerskiltlys; Refleks; Ryggelys; Sidemarkeringslys; Baklys; Tredje bremselys; Blinklys; Annet
fr: Fonction du feu de remorque: Feu de freinage/stop; Feu de gabarit; Combinaison feu arrière/frein/clignotant; Éclairage intérieur/de chargement; Éclairage de plaque d’immatriculation; Réflecteur; Feu de recul; Feu de position latéral; Feu arrière; Troisième feu de freinage; Clignotant; Autre
vi: Chức năng đèn rơ moóc: Đèn phanh/đèn dừng; Đèn báo khoảng sáng gầm; Kết hợp đèn hậu/phanh/rẽ; Đèn nội thất/đèn khoang hành lý; Đèn biển số; Tấm phản quang; Đèn báo lùi; Đèn định vị bên hông; Đèn hậu; Đèn phanh thứ ba; Đèn báo rẽ; Khác
sk-SK: Funkcia svetla prívesu: Brzdové svetlo; Obrysové svetlo; Kombinované zadné/brzdové/smerové svetlo; Osvetlenie interiéru/nákladu; Osvetlenie evidenčného čísla vozidla; Odrazka; Cúvacie svetlo; Bočné obrysové svetlo; Zadné svetlo; Tretie brzdové svetlo; Smerové svetlo; Iné
zh-CN: 拖车灯功能: 刹车/停车灯; 示廓灯; 尾灯/停车灯/转向灯组合; 车内/载货灯; 牌照灯; 反射器; 倒车灯; 侧标志灯; 尾灯; 第三刹车灯; 转向灯; 其他
hr-HR: Značajka svjetla prikolice: Svjetlo kočnice / štop-svjetlo; Gabaritno svjetlo; Kombinirano stražnje svjetlo / štop-svjetlo / pokazivač smjera; Unutarnje/teretno svjetlo; Svjetlo registarske pločice; Reflektor (katadiopter); Svjetlo za vožnju unatrag; Bočno gabaritno svjetlo; Stražnje svjetlo; Treće svjetlo kočnice; Pokazivač smjera; Ostalo
it: Funzione della luce del rimorchio: Luce dei freni/stop; Luce d’ingombro; Combinazione posizione/stop/direzione; Luce interna/vano di carico; Luce targa; Catarifrangente; Luce di retromarcia; Luce di posizione laterale; Luce di posizione posteriore; Terzo stop; Indicatore di direzione; Altro
da: Trailerlygtefunktion: Bremse-/stoplys; Markeringslys; Kombineret bag-/stop-/blinklys; Indvendigt lys/lastlys; Lys til registreringsskilt; Refleks; Baklys; Sidemarkeringslys; Baglys; Tredje bremselys; Blinklys; Andet